Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,104
Complaint; decision not to investigate; notice; review; notice to credential holder; when.

(1) If the department determines that a complaint will not be investigated, the department shall notify the complainant of such determination. At the request of the complainant, the appropriate board may review the complaint and provide its recommendation to the department on whether the complaint merits investigation.

(2) The department shall notify the credential holder that a complaint has been filed and that an investigation will be conducted except when the department determines that such notice may prejudice an investigation.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 104.